Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 41.26.500 and 2005 c 372 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a retiree under the provisions of plan 2 shall not be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.37.010, or 41.35.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030. If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.(2) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.(3) A member or retiree who becomes employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.37.010 shall have the option to enter into membership in the corresponding retirement system for that position notwithstanding any provision of RCW 41.04.270. A retiree who elects to enter into plan membership shall have his or her benefits suspended as provided in subsection (1) of this section. A retiree who does not elect to enter into plan membership shall continue to receive his or her benefits without interruption.(4) A retiree who becomes employed in an eligible position as the chief of the police department of a town or city with fewer than 50,000 people, has the option to either reenter membership in plan 2 or remain a retiree, forego service credit, and continue to receive his or her benefits without interruption.--- END ---